Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.105

Compensation of guardian or conservator.

(1) Subject to court approval, a guardian is entitled to reasonable compensation for services as guardian and to reimbursement for room, board, clothing, and other appropriate expenses advanced for the benefit of the individual subject to guardianship. The court shall determine if the fees charged by a guardian and conservator are just and reasonable.

(2) Subject to court approval, a conservator is entitled to reasonable compensation for services and reimbursement for appropriate expenses from the property of the individual subject to conservatorship.

(3) In determining reasonable compensation for a guardian or conservator, the court, or a conservator in determining reasonable compensation for a guardian as provided in subsection (1) of this section, shall approve compensation that shall not exceed the typical amounts paid for comparable services in the community, at a rate for which the service can be performed in the most efficient and cost-effective manner, considering:

(a) The necessity and quality of the services provided;

(b) The experience, training, professional standing, and skills of the guardian or conservator;

(c) The difficulty of the services performed, including the degree of skill and care required;

(d) The conditions and circumstances under which a service was performed, including whether the service was provided outside regular business hours or under dangerous or extraordinary conditions;

(e) The effect of the services on the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship;

(f) The extent to which the services provided were or were not consistent with the guardian's plan under RCW 11.130.340 or conservator's plan under RCW 11.130.510; and

(g) The fees customarily paid to a person that performs a like service in the community.

(4) A guardian or conservator need not use personal funds of the guardian or conservator for the expenses of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

(5) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship is a department of social and health services client, or health care authority client, and is required to contribute a portion of their income towards the cost of long-term care services or room and board, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the department of social and health services or health care authority by rule.

(6) Where the person subject to guardianship or conservatorship receives guardianship, conservatorship, or other protective services from the *office of public guardianship, the amount of compensation or reimbursement shall not exceed the amount allowed by the *office of public guardianship.

(7) If an individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship seeks to modify or terminate the guardianship or conservatorship or remove the guardian or conservator, the court may order compensation to the guardian or conservator for time spent opposing modification, termination, or removal only to the extent the court determines the opposition was reasonably necessary to protect the interests of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

[ 2020 c 312 s 305; 2019 c 437 s 121.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The "office of public guardianship" was renamed the "office of public guardianship and conservatorship" by 2020 c 312 s 403, effective January 1, 2022.

Effective dates—2020 c 312: See note following RCW 11.130.915.